Washington statutes.
RCW 30A.04.405

Bank acquisition or control—Notice or application—Registration statement—Violations—Penalties.

(1) It is unlawful for any person to acquire control of a bank until thirty days after filing with the director a copy of the notice of change of control required to be filed with the federal deposit insurance corporation or a completed application. The notice or application shall be under oath and contain substantially all of the following information plus any additional information that the director may prescribe as necessary or appropriate in the particular instance for the protection of bank depositors, borrowers, or shareholders and the public interest:

(a) The identity, banking and business experience of each person by whom or on whose behalf acquisition is to be made;

(b) The financial and managerial resources and future prospects of each person involved in the acquisition;

(c) The terms and conditions of any proposed acquisition and the manner in which the acquisition is to be made;

(d) The source and amount of the funds or other consideration used or to be used in making the acquisition, and a description of the transaction and the names of the parties if any part of these funds or other consideration has been or is to be borrowed or otherwise obtained for the purpose of making the acquisition;

(e) Any plan or proposal which any person making the acquisition may have to liquidate the bank, to sell its assets, to merge it with any other bank, or to make any other major change in its business or corporate structure for management;

(f) The identification of any person employed, retained, or to be compensated by the acquiring party, or by any person on its behalf, who makes solicitations or recommendations to shareholders for the purpose of assisting in the acquisition and a brief description of the terms of the employment, retainer, or arrangement for compensation; and

(g) Copies of all invitations for tenders or advertisements making a tender offer to shareholders for the purchase of their stock to be used in connection with the proposed acquisition.

(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, a bank or domestic bank holding company as defined in RCW 30A.04.230 need only notify the director of an intent to acquire control and the date of the proposed acquisition of control at least thirty days before the date of the acquisition of control.

(3) When a person, other than an individual or corporation, is required to file an application under this section, the director may require that the information required by subsection (1)(a), (b), and (f) of this section be given with respect to each person, as defined in RCW 30A.04.400(3), who has an interest in or controls a person filing an application under this subsection.

(4) When a corporation is required to file an application under this section, the director may require that information required by subsection (1)(a), (b), and (f) of this section be given for the corporation, each officer and director of the corporation, and each person who is directly or indirectly the beneficial owner of twenty-five percent or more of the outstanding voting securities of the corporation.

(5) If any tender offer, request, or invitation for tenders or other agreements to acquire control is proposed to be made by means of a registration statement under the Securities Act of 1933 (48 Stat. 74, 15 U.S.C., Sec. 77(a)), as amended, or in circumstances requiring the disclosure of similar information under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (48 Stat. 881, 15 U.S.C., Sec. 78(a)), as amended, the registration statement or application may be filed with the director in lieu of the requirements of this section.

(6) Any acquiring party shall also deliver a copy of any notice or application required by this section to the bank proposed to be acquired within two days after the notice or application is filed with the director.

(7) Any acquisition of control in violation of this section shall be ineffective and void.

(8) Any person who willfully or intentionally violates this section or any rule adopted pursuant thereto is guilty of a gross misdemeanor pursuant to chapter 9A.20 RCW. Each day's violation shall be considered a separate violation, and any person shall upon conviction be fined not more than one thousand dollars for each day the violation continues.

[ 2014 c 37 s 134; 1994 c 92 s 29; 1986 c 279 s 15; 1985 c 305 s 5; 1977 ex.s. c 246 s 2. Formerly RCW 30.04.405.]